Utah statutes.
63G-2-304.   Controlled records.
A record is controlled if:
(1)  the record contains medical, psychiatric, or psychological data about an
individual;
(2)  the governmental entity reasonably believes that:
(a)  releasing the information in the record to the subject of the record
would be detrimental to the subject's mental health or to the safety of any
individual; or
(b)  releasing the information would constitute a violation of normal
professional practice and medical ethics; and
(3)  the governmental entity has properly classified the record.
